District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.06

Council not required to transfer property needed for municipal purposes.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed as requiring the said Council of the District of Columbia to transfer the right, title, and interest in and to so much of the property described in § 6-321.01 as the Council may determine, in its discretion, is required for municipal purposes or is to continue to be owned by the United States under the jurisdiction of the Mayor, for the benefit of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 872, Pub. L. 86-736, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-827.
1973 Ed., § 5-725.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.